Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB766.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Residential dual enrollment program" means a dual enrollment program
in which students of the program reside in student housing; and
(b) "Student housing" means a facility owned, leased, contracted, occupied, or
operated by a public postsecondary education institution that is used to
provide residential accommodations to students of the institution.
(2) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, a public postsecondary education
institution shall not require a student who is within six (6) months of attaining
the age of eighteen (18) years or older on the first day of a semester to:
(a) Reside in student housing;
(b) Pay a fine or fee for not residing in student housing; or
(c) Enter into a student housing contract or agreement as a condition of
admission, enrollment, or entry into any activity, course, program, or
service offered by the institution.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) A student who is not more than seventeen (17) years and six (6) months of
age on the first day of a semester and whose parent or guardian has not
submitted written consent for the student to reside outside of student
housing;
(b) Residential dual enrollment programs; or
(c) The model and practice school under KRS 164.380.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2026 12:00 PM Jacketed